Washington statutes.
RCW 39.46.160

Revenue bonds—Alternative method of issuance—Bonds may include reserve funds.

Any local government issuing revenue bonds under this section and RCW 39.46.150 may include in the amount of any such issue money for the purpose of establishing, maintaining, or increasing reserve funds to:

(1) Secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such revenue bonds; or

(2) Provide for replacements or renewals of or repairs or betterments to revenue producing facilities; or

(3) Provide for contingencies, including, but not limited to, loss of revenue caused by such contingencies.

[ 1986 c 168 s 2.]